Illinois, session 104th, HB3757.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Sections 3-110.15 and 4-108.9 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-110.15 new)7    Sec. 3-110.15. Transfer from Article 4 fund. Until 6 8months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 9104th General Assembly, a person may transfer to a fund 10established under this Article up to 8 years of creditable 11service accumulated in a firefighter pension fund under 12Article 4 that is administered by a unit of local government, 13if that active member was not subject to disciplinary action 14when he or she terminated employment with that employer, upon 15payment to the fund of an amount to be determined by the board, 16equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 17employer contributions transferred to the fund under Section 184-108.9 and the amounts that would have been contributed had 19such contributions been made at the rates applicable to a 20police officer under this Article, plus (ii) interest thereon 21at the actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from the 22date of service to the date of payment.   HB3757- 2 -LRB104 09576 RPS 19639 b1    (40 ILCS 5/4-108.9 new)2    Sec. 4-108.9. Transfer to Article 3 fund.3    (a) At any time during the 6 months following the 4effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 5Assembly, an active member of an Article 3 police pension fund 6may apply for transfer to that fund of up to 8 years of his or 7her creditable service accumulated in a firefighter pension 8fund under this Article that is administered by a unit of local 9government if that active member was not subject to 10disciplinary action when he or she terminated employment with 11that employer. The creditable service shall be transferred 12upon payment by the firefighter pension fund to the Article 3 13fund of an amount equal to:14        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 15    applicant on the books of the fund on the date of transfer 16    for the service to be transferred; and17        (2) employer contributions in an amount equal to the 18    amount determined under item (1); and19        (3) any interest paid by the applicant in order to 20    reinstate service.21    Participation in the firefighter pension fund with respect 22to the transferred creditable service shall terminate on the 23date of transfer.24    (b) At the time of applying for transfer of creditable 25service under this Section, an active member of an Article 3 26police pension fund may, for the purpose of that transfer,   HB3757- 3 -LRB104 09576 RPS 19639 b1reinstate creditable service that was terminated by receipt of 2a refund, by payment to the police pension fund of the amount 3of the refund with interest thereon at the rate of 6% per year, 4compounded annually, from the date of the refund to the date of 5payment. 6    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 7Section 8.49 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)9    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 108 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 11the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 12Act of the 104th General Assembly.